Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.020

Enforcement of chapter—Rules, subject to administrative procedure act.

The director shall enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and may adopt the necessary rules to carry out its purpose. The adoption of rules shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, concerning the adoption of rules, as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 1961 c 285 s 2.]